animal_noun_sinhala.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
    +N      ! Noun tag
    +Sg     ! Singular
    +Pl     ! Plural

LEXICON Root
    Nouns ;

! Sinhala Nouns grouped by final consonant+ා
LEXICON Nouns
පූසා:පූ    N_sa ;  ! පූසා → පූසෝ (සා→සෝ)
අශ්වයා:අශ්ව  N_ya ;  ! අශ්වයා → අශ්වයෝ (යා→යෝ)
කුරුල්ලා:කුරුල් N_la ;  ! කුරුල්ලා → කුරුල්ලෝ (ලා→ලෝ)
මුවා:මු     N_va ;  ! මුවා → මුවෝ (වා→වෝ)
බල්ලා:බල්   N_la ; ! බල්ලා → බල්ලෝ (ලා→ලෝ)

! Lexicons for each consonant type
LEXICON N_sa
+N:0    Num_sa ;

LEXICON N_ya
+N:0    Num_ya ;

LEXICON N_la
+N:0    Num_la ;

LEXICON N_va
+N:0    Num_va ;



! Pluralization rules per consonant
LEXICON Num_sa
+Sg:සා  # ;    ! Singular: add සා
+Pl:සෝ # ;    ! Plural: replace with සෝ
       # ;

LEXICON Num_ya
+Sg:යා  # ;    ! Singular: add යා
+Pl:යෝ # ;    ! Plural: replace with යෝ
       # ;

LEXICON Num_la
+Sg:ලා  # ;    ! Singular: add ලා
+Pl:ලෝ # ;    ! Plural: replace with ලෝ
       # ;

LEXICON Num_va
+Sg:වා  # ;    ! Singular: add වා
+Pl:වෝ # ;    ! Plural: replace with වෝ
       # ;

END
